src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_11х_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iг_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>гээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_3ээ_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_8лүгээ_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_10ээ_204_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_p
	+Gen-ий:%>ий Clit;
	+Gen-ий:%>ий S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_3ээ_205_v4_1_p
	+Dat-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_p
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг Clit;
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_p
	+Abl-ээс:%>ээс Clit;
	+Abl-ээс:%>ээс S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_p
	+Ins-ээр:%>ээр Clit;
	+Ins-ээр:%>ээр S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_p
	+Com-тэй:%>тэй Clit;
	+Com-тэй:%>тэй S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_8лүгээ_205_v4_1_p
	+Com-лүгээ:%>лүгээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1_p
	+Dir-=рүү:%>=рүү Clit;
	+Dir-=рүү:%>=рүү S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_205_11х_206_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_205_12хэн_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iх_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>хээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_205_11х_206_v4_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_1ий_205_v4_1_205_12хэн_206_v4_1_p
	+Poss-хэн:%>хэн Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_2д_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_4ийг_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_5ээс_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_6ээр_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_7тэй_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iг_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>гээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_12хэн_203_v4_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1_205_10ээ_206_v4_1_iг_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>гээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_2д_202_v4_1
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_2д_202_v4_1_202_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_201_2д_202_v4_1_202_10ээ_204_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_4йг_201_v4_2
	S0_0_4йг_201_v4_2_201_10ээ_203_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_4йг_201_v4_2_201_10ээ_203_v4_1_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>ээ Clit;
LEXICON I_8_2_223
	Clit;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4йг_201_v2_2_p;
	S0_0_5ос_201_v2_4_p;
	S0_0_6ор_201_v2_4_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_8_1_224
	Clit;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4йг_201_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_5ас_201_v1_4_p;
	S0_0_6ар_201_v1_4_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_8_2_225
	Clit;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4йг_201_v2_2_p;
	S0_0_5ос_201_v2_4_p;
	S0_0_6ор_201_v2_4_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10о_204_v2_3_p;
LEXICON I_8_1_226
	Clit;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4йг_201_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_5ас_201_v1_4_p;
	S0_0_6ар_201_v1_4_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10а_204_v1_3_p;
LEXICON I_8_4_228
	Clit;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_4йг_201_v4_2_p;
	S0_0_5эс_201_v4_4_p;
	S0_0_6эр_201_v4_4_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_10э_204_v4_3_p;
LEXICON I_9_3_229
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2өнд_201_v3_4_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5нөөс_201_v3_2_p;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_p
	+Gen-ний:%>ний Clit;
	+Gen-ний:%>ний S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_2өнд_201_v3_4_p
	+Dat-д:%>өнд Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>өнд S0_0_2өнд_201_v3_4;
LEXICON S0_0_5нөөс_201_v3_2_p
	+Abl-өөс:%>нөөс Clit;
	+Abl-өөс:%>нөөс S0_0_5нөөс_201_v3_2;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_2д_202_v3_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
	+Kh-х:%>х S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_p
	+Poss-хөн:%>хөн Clit;
	+Poss-хөн:%>хөн S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_2д_202_v3_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_2д_202_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_iө_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_10өө_204_v3_1_p
	+Refl-өө:%>өө Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_iө_p
	+Dat-д:%>өд Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>өд S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_iө;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1_p
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг Clit;
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1_p
	+Abl-өөс:%>өөс Clit;
	+Abl-өөс:%>өөс S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1_p
	+Ins-өөр:%>өөр Clit;
	+Ins-өөр:%>өөр S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1_p
	+Com-тэй:%>тэй Clit;
	+Com-тэй:%>тэй S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_iө
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_iө_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_iө_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p
	+Refl-өө:%>өө Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p
	+Refl-өө:%>өө Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p
	+Refl-өө:%>өө Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p
	+Refl-өө:%>өө Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1_205_10ээ_206_v3_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_11х_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1_205_10ээ_206_v3_1_iг_p
	+Refl-ээ:%>гээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_3өө_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_8лүгээ_205_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_10өө_204_v3_1_p
	+Refl-өө:%>өө Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1_p
	+Gen-ий:%>ий Clit;
	+Gen-ий:%>ий S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_3өө_205_v3_1_p
	+Dat-өө:%>өө Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1_p
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг Clit;
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_4ийг_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1_p
	+Abl-өөс:%>өөс Clit;
	+Abl-өөс:%>өөс S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_5өөс_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1_p
	+Ins-өөр:%>өөр Clit;
	+Ins-өөр:%>өөр S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_6өөр_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1_p
	+Com-тэй:%>тэй Clit;
	+Com-тэй:%>тэй S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_7тэй_205_v3_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_8лүгээ_205_v4_1_p
	+Com-лүгээ:%>лүгээ Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1_p
	+Dir-=рүү:%>=рүү Clit;
	+Dir-=рүү:%>=рүү S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_9=рүү_205_v4_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1_205_11х_206_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1_205_12хөн_206_v3_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_iх_p
	+Refl-өө:%>хөө Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1_205_11х_206_v3_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_1ий_205_v3_1_205_12хөн_206_v3_1_p
	+Poss-хөн:%>хөн Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_201_12хөн_203_v3_1_203_2д_205_v3_1_205_10өө_206_v3_1_p;
